Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3820
Corporation; laws governing.

All corporations organized pursuant to sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall be governed by such other laws regulating profit and nonprofit corporations as do not conflict with sections 44-3801 to 44-3826.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 20.